Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1458
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1458 to 81-1465 shall be known and may be cited as the Law Enforcement Attraction and Retention Act.

Laws 2022, LB1241, § 5.
July 1, 2022June 30, 2028